Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.420

Civil process—Service on extradited person.

A person brought into this state by, or after waiver of, extradition based on a criminal charge shall not be subject to service of personal process in civil actions arising out of the same facts as the criminal proceeding to answer which he or she is being or has been returned, until he or she has been finally convicted in the criminal proceeding, or, if acquitted, until he or she has had reasonable opportunity to return to the state from which he or she was extradited.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1085; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 23.]